tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
adherir/OQWYZ
atribuir/OQWYZ
ceñir/OQWYZ
conseguir/IOQWYZ
disminuir/OQWYZ
excluir/OQWYZ
expedir/HLOQWYZ
impedir/LOQWYZ
leer/OQWYZ
obstruir/OQWYZ
pedir/OQWYZ
reconstruir/OQWYZ
reelegir/OQWYZ
reexpedir/HOQWYZ
releer/OQWYZ
repetir/HNOQWYZ
servir/OQWYZ
sustituir/OQWYZ
transferir/OQWYZ
